District of Columbia statutes.
2-1219.21

Repealed

Redevelopment districts; allocation of tax increment revenues.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 22, 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-169, § 301(g), 45 DCR 5187
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 2401(e), 45 DCR 7193
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689
1981 Ed., § 1-2295.21.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2001(e) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and see § 2001(e) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2001(e) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).